Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB253.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 314 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended to read:Section 314. Income Taxes Imposed by Other States.--(a) A resident taxpayer before allowance of any credit under section 312 shall be allowed a credit against the tax otherwise due under this article for the amount of any income tax, wage tax or tax on or measured by gross or net earned or unearned income imposed on him or on a Pennsylvania S corporation, limited liability company or partnership in which he is a direct or 12345678910111213141516171819202122 indirect shareholder or partner, to the extent [of his pro rata share thereof determined in accordance with section 307.9,] that the tax was imposed on the taxpayer's distributive share or other share thereof by another state with respect to income which is also subject to tax under this article. For purposes of this subsection, the term "state" shall only include a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico and any territory or possession of the United States.(b) The credit provided under this section shall not exceed the proportion of the tax otherwise due under this article that the amount of the taxpayer's income subject to tax by the other jurisdiction bears to his entire taxable income.(c) In lieu of submitting a copy of each State return in which a tax liability is reported and tax is paid, a member, partner, shareholder, partnership or Pennsylvania S corporation may provide a certified statement that reflects each member's, partner's or shareholder's share of taxable income, amount of State income tax paid and other information that the department requires.Section 2. The amendment or addition of section 314(a) and (c) shall apply to taxable years beginning after December 31, 2021.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0253PN0204 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324